Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Speed Regulations

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 288 to 305.

Indefiniteness of automobile speed regulations as affecting validity, 6 ALR3d 1326.

Radar and speed: proof, by radar or other mechanical or electronic devices, of violation of speed regulations, 47 ALR3d 822.

Radar detector: possession or operation of device for detecting or avoiding traffic radar as criminal offense, 17 ALR4th 1334.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 63 to 68; 61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1435 to 1453.

§ 31-5-301.
Maximum speed limits.

No person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions and having regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing. Consistent with the foregoing, every person shall drive at a safe and appropriate speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hillcrest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway and when special hazards exist with respect to pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower speed for compliance with subsection (a) of this section, subject to W.S. 31-5-203(b), the limits specified in this subsection or established as otherwise authorized shall be maximum lawful speeds and no person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed in excess of maximum limits:

Twenty (20) miles per hour when passing a school building, the grounds thereof, within any other area or space in the vicinity of a school designated by an official traffic control device as a school zone with a reduced speed limit or a school crossing if appropriate signs giving notice of a reduced speed limit are erected;

Thirty (30) miles per hour in any urban district and in any residence district or subdivision except on roads that have been designated a private road pursuant to W.S. 18-5-306(a)(vii);

Except as provided under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, seventy-five (75) miles per hour on interstate highways. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to:

Affect the authority of the superintendent to otherwise designate lower or higher maximum speed limits on interstate highways in accordance with other laws; or

Authorize noncompliance with posted speed limits on interstate highways.

For all other locations for which a maximum speed limit is not specified under this subsection, sixty-five (65) miles per hour where the roadway is paved and fifty-five (55) miles per hour where the roadway is unpaved;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 61, § 2.

Notwithstanding paragraph (iii) of this subsection, eighty (80) miles per hour on interstate highways designated by the superintendent;

Seventy (70) miles per hour on state highways, as defined in W.S. 31-18-101(a)(xvii), that are not interstate highways, as defined in W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi).

Subject to W.S. 31-5-203(b), the maximum speed limits set forth in this section may be altered as authorized in W.S.

31-5-302

and

31-5-303

.

Speeding violations of up to eighty (80) miles per hour where the posted speed limit is at least sixty-five (65) miles per hour but not more than seventy-five (75) miles per hour, or less than six (6) miles per hour over the posted speed limit in all other instances and zones, except violations for exceeding the speed limit in a school zone, or construction zone, and violations received while operating a commercial motor vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(viii), shall not be made a part of the abstracts or records kept by the department of transportation pursuant to W.S.

31-5-1214

or

31-7-120

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 36; C.S. 1945, § 60-636; W.S. 1957, § 31-130; Laws 1959, ch. 55, § 1; 1963, ch. 33, § 1; 1967, ch. 213, § 1; 1969, ch. 18, § 1; 1973, ch. 194, § 2; 1976, ch. 23, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 160, § 1; 1987, Sp. Sess, ch. 4, § 1; 1991, ch. 168, § 1; 1997, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 1; 2004, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 192, § 1; 2011, ch. 32, § 1; 2012, ch. 70, § 1; 2014 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 139, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2015 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 114, § 1, effective March 14, 2016.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “where the posted speed limit is at least sixty-five (65) miles per hour, or less than six (6) miles per hour over the posted speed limit in all other instances and zones, except violations for exceeding the speed limit in a school zone, or construction zone, and violations” for “under W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii) or up to seventy (70) miles per hour under W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv), except violations” in (d).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(i) deleted “or” following “passing a school building,”, inserted “within any other area or space in the vicinity of a school designated by an official traffic control device as a school zone with a reduced speed limit” preceding “or a school crossing” and substituted “a reduced speed” for “that” preceding “limit are erected.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(ii), inserted “and in any residence district or subdivision except on roads that have been designated a private road pursuant to W.S. 18-5-306(a)(vii)”; and in (b)(iv), inserted “For all other locations,” and substituted “where the roadway is paved and fifty-five (55) miles per hour where the roadway is unpaved” for “in other locations.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “subject to W.S. 31-5-203(b)” in (b) and (c).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(iii)(A), inserted “or higher”, deleted “except as provided for in W.S. 31-5-303(b)”; and in (d), inserted “but not more than seventy-five (75) miles per hour.”

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment by ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (b)(iii), added the exception; added (b)(vi); and made a related change.

The second
2015 amendment by ch. 139, § 1, in (b)(iii), added the exception at the beginning; in (b)(iv), added the last sentence; added (vi); and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 139, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

inserted, in (b)(iv), “for which a maximum speed limit is not specified under this subsection” in the first sentence and deleted “However, the superintendent may designate higher maximum speed limits on paved roadways pursuant to W.S.

31-5-302

” at the end; added (b)(vii); and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2016 ch. 114, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

Speed alone does not establish liability for negligence. —

Excessive speed in operation of an automobile does not alone establish liability as the proximate cause of an accident, unless it is shown that the accident could have been avoided in the absence of such speed. O'Malley v. Eagan, 43 Wyo. 233, 2 P.2d 1063,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 350, 5 P.2d 276,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1931).

The speed of a vehicle is not in and of itself material on a question of negligence, the question being whether the speed was dangerous under all circumstances. Anderson v. Schulz, 527 P.2d 151,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1974).

Nor does absence of speeding show no negligence. —

A driver cannot escape blame for negligence by the mere showing that he was not exceeding the maximum legal speed limit at the time of the accident. Anderson v. Schulz, 527 P.2d 151,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1974).

Speeding not necessarily criminal carelessness. —

Driving a car at a speed that is unreasonable or such that is likely to endanger life or limb is not necessarily criminal carelessness, within the provisions of §

6-2-105

(manslaughter). State v. McComb, 33 Wyo. 346, 239 P. 526,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1925).

Violation of provisions evidence of reckless intent. —

Evidence that the defendant violated §§ 31-5-115(f), (g) and (j), 31-5-203(a)(i), and 31-5-210(a) and this section could form a basis for the conclusion that the defendant was driving in a manner that he knew, or should have known, was highly dangerous to others and that he did so intentionally, or heedlessly, with a careless indifference to the consequences. Harvey v. State, 596 P.2d 1386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1979).

Traveler with automobile on highway is bound to exercise reasonable care.

Gamet v. Beazley, 62 Wyo. 1, 159 P.2d 916,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1945).

Speed, control, and duty to maintain adequate lookout are interrelated.

As speed increases, the duty to be alert and have one's automobile under adequate control increases. Anderson v. Schulz, 527 P.2d 151,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1974).

Other motorist's negligence does not mean speeder not negligent. —

From the fact that a motorist is negligent in failing to see an approaching truck, it does not follow that the truck driver is not negligent in not operating his truck at a reasonable and proper speed. Pierce v. Bean, 57 Wyo. 189, 115 P.2d 660,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1941).

Question of fact as to negligence. —

The driving of a car on an icy road at speeds of 40 to 45 miles per hour presents a question of fact as to negligence when it skids to the side of the highway. Zanetti Bus Lines, Inc. v. Hurd, 320 F.2d 123, 1963 U.S. App. LEXIS 4570 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1963).

Instruction held not erroneous. —

In prosecution for causing death while driving car at unreasonable speed, while intoxicated, and without having car under absolute control, instruction authorizing conviction, if deceased came to death by one or more of modes in which defendant drove automobile, was not erroneous. Thompson v. State, 41 Wyo. 72, 283 P. 151,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1929).

Evidence supported finding that defendant was negligent in driving car at excessive speed. —

See Oviatt v. Hohnholtz, 43 Wyo. 174, 299 P. 1037,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1931).

Applied

in

Dr. Pepper Co. v. Heiman, 374 P.2d 206,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1962); Krahn v. Pierce, 485 P.2d 1021,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1971); State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Runnion v. Kitts, 531 P.2d 1307,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1975); State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Guadagnoli, 677 P.2d 823,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1984); Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Norfolk v. State, 360 P.2d 605,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

Colwell v. Anderson, 438 P.2d 448,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1968); Dawson v. City of Casper, 731 P.2d 1186,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1987); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumption and burden of proof of accuracy of scientific and mechanical instruments for measuring speed, temperature, time and the like, 21 ALR2d 1200.

Meaning of “resident's district,” “business district,” “school area” and the like in statutes and ordinances regulating speed of motor vehicles, 50 ALR2d 343.

Admissibility and probative effect of testimony that motor vehicle was going “fast” or the like, 92 ALR2d 1391.

Speed, alone or in connection with other circumstances, as gross negligence, wantonness, recklessness or the like under automobile guest statute, 6 ALR3d 769.

Indefiniteness of automobile speed regulations as affecting validity, 6 ALR3d 1326.

Admissibility, in automobile negligence action, of charts showing braking distance, reaction times, etc., 9 ALR3d 976.

Speeding prosecution based on observation from aircraft, 27 ALR3d 1446.

Opinion testimony as to speed of motor vehicle based on skid marks and other facts, 29 ALR3d 248.

Competency of nonexpert's testimony based on sound alone as to speed of motor vehicle involved in accident, 33 ALR3d 1405.

Proof, by radar or other mechanical or electronic devices, of violation of speed regulations, 47 ALR3d 822.

Liability of public authority for injury arising out of automobile race conducted on street or highway, 80 ALR3d 1192.

Possession or operation of device for detecting or avoiding traffic radar as criminal offense, 17 ALR4th 1334.

Motor vehicle operator's liability for accident occurring while driving with vision obscured by smoke or steam, 32 ALR4th 933.

§ 31-5-302.
Establishment of specific maximum speed limits by superintendent.

Whenever the superintendent determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, or in the event of a vehicle or weather emergency, that a maximum speed greater or less than that authorized herein is safe and reasonable under the conditions found to exist at any intersection or other place or upon any part of the state highway system, the superintendent, except as provided for in W.S. 31-5-303(b), may determine and declare a reasonable and safe maximum limit thereat, which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected and which shall not exceed eighty (80) miles per hour on interstate highways. The maximum speed limit may be declared to be effective at all times or at such times as are indicated upon the signs and differing limits may be established for different times of day, different types of vehicles, varying weather conditions, and other factors bearing on safe speeds, which shall be effective when posted upon appropriate fixed or variable signs. This section does not grant power to the superintendent to declare statewide or countywide maximum speed limits but grants power to declare maximum speed limits for the public safety in localized geographic areas.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 37; C.S. 1945, § 60-637; W.S. 1957, § 31-131; Laws 1959, ch. 55, § 2; 1967, ch. 213, § 2; 1976, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 1; 2007, ch. 122, § 1; 2014 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 139, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 114, § 1, effective March 14, 2016.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “, or in the event of a vehicle or weather emergency,” preceding “that a maximum speed.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence, deleted “required for”, “vehicle operation”, and inserted “and which shall not exceed eighty (80) miles per hour on interstate highways.”

The 2015 amendment,

added “or seventy (70) miles per hour on state highways, as defined in
W.S. 31-18-101(a)(xvii), that are not interstate highways, as defined in
W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi)” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

deleted “or seventy (70) miles per hour on state highways, as defined in W.S. 31-18-101(a)(xvii), that are not interstate highways, as defined in W.S. 31-18-801(a)(xvi)” following “highways” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2016 ch. 114, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

Alteration of speed limits not required. —

Speed limits which are set pursuant to this section or §

31-5-303

need not be “altered” from the 55-mile-per-hour (now 75-mile-per-hour) limit, as permitted under § 31-5-301(c): the clear language of these sections connotes the authority to establish safe maximum speed limits which conceptually are not “altered” from the 55-mile-per-hour (now 75-mile-per-hour) limit set forth in § 31-5-301(b)(iii). State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 31-5-303.
Establishing maximum speed limits by local authorities.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 2.

In compliance with rules promulgated by the department, local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may determine the proper maximum speed for all streets and highways within their respective corporate jurisdiction which maximum speed is reasonable and safe and which may be greater or less than the maximum speed permitted under this act. The rules promulgated by the department shall adopt standards consistent with national practices.

Any altered limit established under this section shall be effective during hours of darkness or at other times as may be determined when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street or highway.

Any alteration of maximum limits on state highways or extensions thereof in a municipality by local authorities is not effective until the alteration has been approved by the superintendent.

Not more than six (6) alterations authorized under this section shall be made per mile along a street or highway, except in the case of reduced limits at intersections, and the difference between adjacent limits shall not be more than fifteen (15) miles per hour.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 38; C.S. 1945, § 60-638; W.S. 1957, § 31-132; Laws 1959, ch. 55, § 3; 1967, ch. 213, § 3; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1989, ch. 4, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 32, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted the first sentence for the former first sentence which read: “Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions shall determine by an engineering and a traffic investigation the proper maximum speed for all streets and highways within their city limits under their corporate jurisdiction and shall declare a reasonable and safe maximum limit thereon which may be greater or less than the maximum speed permitted under this act for an urban district,” and inserted the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Alteration of speed limits not required. —

Speed limits which are set pursuant to this section or §

31-5-302

need not be “altered” from a 55-mile-per-hour (now 75-mile-per-hour) limit, as permitted under § 31-5-301(c): the clear language of these sections connotes the authority to establish safe maximum speed limits which conceptually are not “altered” from the 55-mile-per-hour (now 75-mile-per-hour) limit set forth in § 31-5-301(b)(iii). State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 31-5-304.
Minimum speed limits.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle at such a slow speed as to impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic except when reduced speed is necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law.

Whenever the superintendent determines on the basis of an engineering and a traffic investigation that slow speeds on any part of a highway consistently impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, the superintendent may determine and declare a minimum speed limit below which no person shall drive a vehicle except when necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law and that limit is effective when posted upon appropriate fixed or variable signs. A local authority may make the determination permitted under this subsection by complying with rules adopted by the department for this purpose, which rules shall adopt standards consistent with national practices.

Notwithstanding any minimum speed that may be authorized and posted pursuant to this section, no person shall operate a vehicle in the extreme left-hand lane of a controlled-access highway for a prolonged period in a manner which impedes the flow of other traffic traveling at a lawful rate of speed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 39; C.S. 1945, § 60-639; W.S. 1957, § 31-133; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 1; 2005, ch. 44, § 1; 2011, ch. 32, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “determines” for “or local authorities within their respective jurisdictions determine,” deleted “or local authority” preceding “may determine,” and added the last sentence.

Section inapplicable to truck working upon highway. —

This section is not applicable to a highway truck when conditions on the highway are far from normal and the truck is actually engaged in work upon the surface of the highway. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Driver not required to anticipate violation of section. —

A driver driving a car at 50 miles an hour over the crest of a hill on an open road at dawn is not required to anticipate that anyone will be driving a car at a slow rate of speed in violation of this section. Templar v. Tongate, 71 Wyo. 148, 255 P.2d 223,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1953).

Quoted

in

Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application and effect, in civil motor vehicle accident case, of “slow speed” traffic statute prohibiting driving at such a slow speed as to create danger, to impede normal traffic movement or the like, 66 ALR2d 1194.

§ 31-5-305.
Special speed limit at bridges and other elevated structures.

No person shall drive a vehicle over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to the bridge or structure when the structure is signposted as provided in this section.

The superintendent and local authorities on highways under their respective jurisdictions may conduct an investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and if he or they find that the structure cannot with safety to itself withstand vehicles traveling at the speed otherwise permissible under this act, the superintendent or local authorities shall determine and declare the maximum speed of vehicles which the structure can safely withstand and shall cause or permit suitable signs stating the maximum speed to be erected and maintained before each end of the structure.

Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of this section, proof of the determination of the maximum speed by the superintendent and the existence of the signs constitutes conclusive evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to the bridge or structure.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 41; C.S. 1945, § 60-641; W.S. 1957, § 31-135; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-306

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-306.
Charging violations; burden of proving proximate cause.

In every charge of violation of any speed regulation in this act except a charge under W.S. 31-5-301(a) the complaint, also the summons or notice to appear, shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven, also the maximum speed applicable within the district or at the location.

The provision of this act declaring maximum speed limitations shall not be construed to relieve the plaintiff in any action from the burden of proving negligence on the part of the defendant as the proximate cause of an accident.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 42; C.S. 1945, § 60-642; W.S. 1957, § 31-136; Laws 1959, ch. 55, § 6; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-307; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).